Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-2516
Signature sheet; requirements.

Every signature sheet shall:

(1) Contain the caption required in subdivision (1)(a) of section 18-2513;

(2) Be part of a complete and authorized petition when presented to potential signatories; and

(3) Comply with the requirements of section 32-628.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 16;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 10;

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 500.